src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-norm.yaml
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozomiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozomiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+4+Prt: owaaboozominiiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozominiidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozomiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozomiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozominaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozominaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozominaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozominaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozominaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozominaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozomiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozomiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozomiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+4+4: owaaboozominiwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+4+Loc: owaaboozominiing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+4+Pl: owaaboozominiwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+4: owaaboozomiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozomiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozomiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+4: niwaaboozomibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozomibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozomibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+4: giwaaboozomibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozomibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozomibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+4: owaaboozomibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: owaaboozomibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: owaaboozomibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+4: iwaaboozomibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozomibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Pos+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozomibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozoshinaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoshinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoshinaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoshinaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoshiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoshiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt: owaaboozoshiniiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoshiniidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozoshiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoshiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozoshinaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoshinaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoshinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozoshinaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoshinaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoshinaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozoshiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoshiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoshiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+4+4: owaaboozoshiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+4+Loc: owaaboozoshiniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+4+Pl: owaaboozoshiniwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+4: owaaboozoshiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoshiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoshiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+4: niwaaboozoshibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozoshibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozoshibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+4: giwaaboozoshibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozoshibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozoshibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+4: owaaboozoshibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoshibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoshibaniig
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+4: iwaaboozoshibaniin
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: iwaaboozoshibaniing
     X+waabooz+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: iwaaboozoshibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: niwaaboozonaanibaniin
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: niwaaboozonaanibaniing
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: niwaaboozonaanibaniig
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: niwaaboozonaanidigan
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozonaanidiging
     1+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozonaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozonaanibaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozonaanibaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozonaanibaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozonaanidigan
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozonaanidiging
     2+waabooz+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozonaanidigag
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt+4: giwaaboozowaabaniin
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: giwaaboozowaabaniing
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: giwaaboozowaabaniig
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: giwaaboozowaadigan
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozowaadiging
     2+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozowaadigag
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Prt+4: owaaboozoniibaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Prt+Loc: owaaboozoniibaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Prt+Pl: owaaboozoniibaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozoniidigan
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoniidiging
     3+waabooz+NA+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoniidigag
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt+4: owaaboozowaabaniin
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: owaaboozowaabaniing
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: owaaboozowaabaniig
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: owaaboozowaadigan
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: owaaboozowaadiging
     3+waabooz+NA+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: owaaboozowaadigag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozoonyishibaniin
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonyishibaniing
     waabooz+NA+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonyishibaniig
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozoonsishibaniin
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsishibaniing
     waabooz+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonsishibaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: niwaaboozoonyimishinaan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: niwaaboozoonsimishinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishiwaa
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishinaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishiwaa
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4: owaaboozoonyimishini
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishiwaa
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4: owaaboozoonsimishini
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: niwaaboozoonyimishiban
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonyimishidig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: niwaaboozoonsimishiban
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonsimishidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: giwaaboozoonyimishiban
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: giwaaboozoonsimishiban
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: owaaboozoonyimishiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: owaaboozoonsimishiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishidig
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Prt: iwaaboozoonyimishiban
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozoonyimishidig
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Prt: iwaaboozoonsimishiban
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Voc+Pl: iwaaboozoonsimishidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: niwaaboozoonyimishan
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: niwaaboozoonyimishing
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: niwaaboozoonyimishag
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: niwaaboozoonsimishan
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: niwaaboozoonsimishing
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: niwaaboozoonsimishag
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: giwaaboozoonyimishan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimishing
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimishag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: giwaaboozoonsimishan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimishing
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimishag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: owaaboozoonyimishan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: owaaboozoonyimishing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: owaaboozoonyimishag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: owaaboozoonsimishan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: owaaboozoonsimishing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: owaaboozoonsimishag
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+4: iwaaboozoonyimishan
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Loc: iwaaboozoonyimishing
     X+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pl: iwaaboozoonyimishag
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+4: iwaaboozoonsimishan
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Loc: iwaaboozoonsimishing
     X+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pl: iwaaboozoonsimishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozoonyiminaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonyiminaanidig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: niwaaboozoonsiminaaniban
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: niwaaboozoonsiminaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonyiminaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonyiminaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonyimiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimiwaadig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonsiminaaniban
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonsiminaanidig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: giwaaboozoonsimiwaaban
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+Prt: owaaboozoonyiminiiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonyiminiidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozoonyimiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonyimiwaadig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+Prt: owaaboozoonsiminiiban
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonsiminiidig
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Prt: owaaboozoonsimiwaaban
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: owaaboozoonsimiwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonyiminaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonyiminaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonyiminaanig
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+4: niwaaboozoonsiminaanin
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: niwaaboozoonsiminaaning
     1+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: niwaaboozoonsiminaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyiminaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyiminaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyiminaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonyimiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonyimiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonyimiwaag
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsiminaanin
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsiminaaning
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+1+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsiminaanig
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+4: giwaaboozoonsimiwaan
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: giwaaboozoonsimiwaang
     2+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: giwaaboozoonsimiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+4: owaaboozoonyiminiwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+Loc: owaaboozoonyiminiing
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+4+Pl: owaaboozoonyiminiwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+4: owaaboozoonyimiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonyimiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonyimiwaag
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+4: owaaboozoonsiminiwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+Loc: owaaboozoonsiminiing
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+4+Pl: owaaboozoonsiminiwa
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+4: owaaboozoonsimiwaan
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Loc: owaaboozoonsimiwaang
     3+waabooz+NA+Dim+Pos+3+Pl+Pl: owaaboozoonsimiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 6, 7
     1+waabooz+NA+Con+Pos+Prt+4: niwaaboozoonyimibaniin
